trunk/incubator/comb.da.dix
    <!-- =============================================================== -->
    <!--                      U N C H E C K E D                          -->
    <!-- =============================================================== -->
    <pardef n="cirk/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>len</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lerne</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>   
    <pardef n="bold__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ateist__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="alibi__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="abe__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/and__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ænderne</l>
          <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ænder</l>
          <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anden</l>
          <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>and</l>
          <r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/ader__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aderen</l>
          <r>ader<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ader</l>
          <r>ader<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ædrene</l>
          <r>ader<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ædre</l>
          <r>ader<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="snab/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elen</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>len</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lerne</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="treer__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sodavand__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e(r)ne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/od__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ødderne</l>
          <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ødder</l>
          <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oden</l>
          <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>od</l>
          <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paranød__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>den</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>derne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>der</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bistandslov"><i>bistandslov</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blousonjakke"><i>blousonjakke</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bonbon"><i>bonbon</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="composé"><i>composé</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dørk"><i>dørk</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eskapist"><i>eskapist</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="etape"><i>etape</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gætteri"><i>gætteri</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gople"><i>gople</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hovedvej"><i>hovedvej</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hyldning"><i>hyldning</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kurtage"><i>kurtage</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mandat"><i>mandat</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="membran"><i>membran</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="præmie"><i>præmie</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pult"><i>pult</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="renovering"><i>renovering</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="signal"><i>signal</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skyldfølelse"><i>skyldfølelse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sølvbrud"><i>sølvbrud</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stregning"><i>stregning</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="telefonkæde"><i>telefonkæde</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tilskæreri"><i>tilskæreri</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tvekamp"><i>tvekamp</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vækst"><i>vækst</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ådselbille"><i>ådselbille</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="centralstyrelse"><i>centralstyrelse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fremmedgørelse"><i>fremmedgørelse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="landsskatteretsafgørelse"><i>landsskatteretsafgørelse</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rufferske"><i>rufferske</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sultestrejke"><i>sultestrejke</i><par n="abe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antihistamin"><i>antihistamin</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="børst"><i>børst</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dyrtidsfond"><i>dyrtidsfond</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forkæl"><i>forkæl</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hyld"><i>hyld</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kvast"><i>kvast</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="overløb"><i>overløb</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="solsystem"><i>solsystem</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="visir"><i>visir</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
    <e lm="attestation"><i>attestation</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="civiløkonom"><i>civiløkonom</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="færdiggøring"><i>færdiggøring</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grænsedragning"><i>grænsedragning</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="komponering"><i>komponering</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="renskrivning"><i>renskrivning</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tovejskommunikation"><i>tovejskommunikation</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bededag"><i>bededag</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="druktur"><i>druktur</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gavl"><i>gavl</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kobbersmed"><i>kobbersmed</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="påhængsvogn"><i>påhængsvogn</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skilift"><i>skilift</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stinksvamp"><i>stinksvamp</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="udfaldsport"><i>udfaldsport</i><par n="bold__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anførs"><i>anførs</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="artik"><i>artik</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="batchkørs"><i>batchkørs</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blomsterhand"><i>blomsterhand</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="byttehand"><i>byttehand</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dagbladsartik"><i>dagbladsartik</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fab"><i>fab</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forholdsreg"><i>forholdsreg</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kneb"><i>kneb</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meritoverførs"><i>meritoverførs</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nud"><i>nud</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="polyglotbib"><i>polyglotbib</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skærmyds"><i>skærmyds</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="solaveks"><i>solaveks</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="variab"><i>variab</i><par n="cirk/el__n"/></e>
